Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1884.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 9. General Permit Modernization.--(a) Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 shall establish a centralized online application system for general permits under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L (relating to general permits). The system shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) A unified interface for the electronic submission of all of the following for an application for a general permit under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L:(i) Project descriptions.(ii) Pennsylvania Natural Diversity Inventory clearances.(iii) Geotagged photographs.(iv) Site-specific data.(2) Functionality for geographic information system mapping, permit tracking and mobile accessibility.(b) The department shall retain a paper-based application process for applications for general permits under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L and may not eliminate the availability of such process.(c) Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop and make publicly available standardized drawings, processes, procedures and instructions for a general permit under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L. The standardized drawings, processes, procedures and instructions shall include, as applicable, the following:(1) Construction specifications.(2) Descriptions of permissible activities.(3) Limits of disturbance.(4) Conditions of enforcement.(5) Standard erosion and sediment control plans.(d) An applicant for a general permit under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L whose proposed project does not conform to the 20250HB1884PN2345 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standardized drawings and instructions under subsection (c) may submit a custom application for independent review by the department.(e) Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop and integrate into the application process for a general permit under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L, a permit-specific checklist for each general permit.(f) Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall establish an automated system for the issuance of notices to proceed. The system shall notify the applicant for a general permit under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L, relevant regulatory agencies and county conservation districts upon all of the following:(1) Submission of a complete application for a general permit under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L.(2) Receipt of all necessary Pennsylvania Natural Diversity Inventory clearances for the general permit. The Pennsylvania Natural Diversity Inventory shall be available and built into the system.(3) Payment of applicable fees for the general permit.(4) Notice of intent approval, sent to all necessary agencies, departments and government entities, which shall:(i) Be automatic and electronic.(ii) Provide a receipt and full electronic copy of the entire application, payment and all other required supporting documents.(g) After an applicant for a general permit under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L receives a notice to proceed, the applicant may begin the activities to be authorized under the 20250HB1884PN2345 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 general permit.(h) Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall establish and implement uniform standards for the enforcement and inspection of activities conducted under general permits issued in accordance with 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L. The standards shall include all of the following:(1) Consistent enforcement procedures across all regional offices of the department.(2) A centralized digital dashboard for use by department inspectors to access general permit data, inspection schedules and compliance records.(3) Training for all department personnel responsible for inspections on the administration of uniform enforcement procedures.(i) Beginning two years after the effective date of this subsection and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate and the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include all of the following:(1) A summary of progress in implementing the requirements of this section.(2) Usage statistics for the centralized online application system established under subsection (a).(3) The number of general permits issued under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 Subch. L, disaggregated by permit type.(4) Trends in compliance and enforcement.(5) Any recommendations for further regulatory or statutory improvements.20250HB1884PN2345 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1884PN2345 - 5 - 1